Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1871.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commercial and Industrial NONRESIDENTIAL Products and Property Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial entity." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth by being certified to conduct business by the Department of State."Electrified security system." An alarm system with an assembly of battery-charged equipment and all of its integrated <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 components and equipment, including a monitored alarm device intended to notify the entity monitoring the alarm system of possible intrusion to the property, an energizer which is intended to periodically deliver pulses to a security system, a battery charging device used exclusively to charge the system battery and any other integrated components. The term does not include a fence system used primarily for the containment of livestock or other animals."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY OF THE COMMONWEALTH."ELECTRIFIED SECURITY SYSTEM." AN OUTDOOR ALARM SYSTEM THAT IS COMPLIANT WITH THE INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD WITH AN ASSEMBLY OF BATTERY-CHARGED EQUIPMENT AND ALL OF ITS INTEGRATED COMPONENTS AND EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING A MONITORED ALARM DEVICE INTENDED TO NOTIFY THE ENTITY MONITORING THE ALARM SYSTEM OF POSSIBLE INTRUSION TO THE PROPERTY, AN ENERGIZER WHICH IS INTENDED TO PERIODICALLY DELIVER PULSES TO A SECURITY SYSTEM, A BATTERY CHARGING DEVICE USED EXCLUSIVELY TO CHARGE THE SYSTEM BATTERY AND ANY OTHER INTEGRATED COMPONENTS. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A FENCE SYSTEM USED PRIMARILY FOR THE CONTAINMENT OF LIVESTOCK OR OTHER ANIMALS."INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD." THE 3.0 EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD 60335-2-76 OR A SUBSEQUENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD ADOPTED BY REGULATION UNDER SECTION 4."Municipality." A county, city, township, borough, incorporated town, home rule municipality or other general purpose unit of government established by an act of the General Assembly.20250HB1871PN2441 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Electrified security system requirements.(a) Installation.--A commercial entity or industrial entity located in this Commonwealth may install an electrified security system in accordance with this act to protect property, products and any other commercial and industrial-related interests of the commercial entity or industrial entity from any unlawful actions. AN ENTITY AUTHORIZED TO CONDUCT BUSINESS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH UNDER 15 PA.C.S. (RELATING TO CORPORATIONS AND UNINCORPORATED ASSOCIATIONS) MAY INSTALL AN ELECTRIFIED SECURITY SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ACT.(b) Requirements for compliance.--An electrified security system installation shall:(1) Comply with the specifications in the 3.0 edition of the International Electrotechnical Commission Standard 60335-2-76.(2) Have an energizer that is driven by a commercial storage battery not to exceed 12 volts direct current.(3) Interface with a monitored alarm device that transmits a signal to the alarm monitoring company in response to an intrusion. The system may not directly connect to or call law enforcement. INSTALLER OR A PERSON THAT IS MONITORING OR OTHERWISE INSTRUCTED TO NOTIFY A PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY OF THE ALARM. THE SYSTEM MAY NOT DIRECTLY CONNECT TO OR CALL LAW ENFORCEMENT.(4) Be located four inches to eight inches behind a nonelectrified perimeter barrier not less than five feet in height but not to exceed 10 feet in height, or two feet higher than the nonelectrified perimeter barrier, whichever is higher. AND HAVE A HEIGHT OF EITHER TWO FEET HIGHER THAN THE NONELECTRIFIED PERIMETER BARRIER OR 10 FEET, WHICHEVER IS 20250HB1871PN2441 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GREATER.(5) Be located on property that is not designated by a municipality exclusively for residential use.(6) Be clearly identified with warning signs containing the international electrified warning symbol FOR ELECTRIC SHOCK at intervals of not greater than 30 linear feet.(c) Installer requirements.--The installer of an electrified security system shall provide notice to the municipality that the electrified security system has been installed pursuant to subsection (b) and the notice shall contain the alarm company installation name, the business entity name and address where the electrified security system was installed.(d) Local regulation.--A municipality may:(1) Require registration of an alarm system for the electrified security system.(2) Prohibit an electrified security system that does not meet the requirements of this section.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to apply to 18 Pa.C.S. § 7511(f) (relating to control of alarm devices and automatic dialing devices).SECTION 4. ADOPTION OF SUBSEQUENT EDITIONS.(A) ADOPTION.--FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT A SUBSEQUENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD, OR A SPECIFIED PORTION OF A SUBSEQUENT EDITION, BY REGULATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(B) STANDARDS.--IN ADOPTING A SUBSEQUENT EDITION OF INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT THE SUBSEQUENT EDITION IS 20250HB1871PN2441 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSISTENT WITH THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT, INCLUDING PROTECTING PROPERTY, PRODUCTS AND ANY OTHER COMMERCIAL AND NONRESIDENTIAL INTERESTS OF THE COMMERCIAL ENTITY OR THE ENTITY OPERATING A PROPERTY IN EXCLUSIVE NONRESIDENTIAL USE FROM ANY UNLAWFUL ACT.(C) NO AUTOMATIC INCORPORATION.--A SUBSEQUENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD SHALL HAVE NO FORCE OR EFFECT UNDER THIS ACT UNLESS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.(D) NOTICE.--UPON ADOPTION OF A SUBSEQUENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL ELECTROTECHNICAL COMMISSION STANDARD, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE COMMUNITY, ECONOMIC AND RECREATIONAL DEVELOPMENT COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE COMMERCE COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.SECTION 5. CONSTRUCTION.NOTHING IN THIS ACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY TO SECURITY ALARM SYSTEMS THAT DO NOT ATTACH TO A SECURITY FENCE SYSTEM CAPABLE OF DELIVERING AN ELECTRIC PULSE.Section 5 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1871PN2441 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021